Wyoming, session 2025, SF0194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
Section 1. W.S. 14-3-311 and 39-18-112 are created to
read:

14-3-311. Delivery sales of electronic cigarette and
vapor material prohibited.

(a) No person shall sell, or cause to be sold, to a
consumer in this state an electronic cigarette or vapor
material by a delivery sale.

(b) Any person who violates this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable in the same manner provided for in
W.S. 14-3-302(d) and (e).

39-18-112. Certifications by manufacturers of
electronic cigarettes or vapor material.

(a) Each electronic cigarette or vapor material
manufacturer who manufactures electronic cigarettes or
vapor material sold at retail or to a consumer in this
state, whether directly or through a wholesaler,
distributor, retailer or similar intermediary or
intermediaries, shall file an annual certification as
SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
provided in this section as a condition of obtaining or
maintaining an electronic cigarette or vapor material
manufacturer license.

(b) A certification filed under this section shall be
made on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department
and shall include the following:

(i) The name and address of the applicant or, if
the applicant is a firm, partnership, limited liability
company or association, the name and address of each of its
members or, if the applicant is a corporation, the name and
address of each of its officers and the address of its
principal place of business;

(ii) The location of the principal place of
business the applicant seeking a license;

(iii) Either:

(A) A copy of the Prevent All Cigarette
Trafficking (PACT) Act Registration Form (ATF Form 5070.1)
as submitted by the applicant to the bureau of alcohol,
SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
tobacco, firearms and explosives of the United States
department of justice, and an attestation that the
applicant is in compliance with, and will continue to
comply with, all applicable requirements of 15 U.S.C. §§
375 and 376; or

(B) A statement explaining why the PACT Act
is not applicable to the applicant and its products.

(iv) An attestation that the applicant's
products fully comply with the requirements of the United
States customs and border protection agency, including
accurate entry summary forms (CPB Form 7501), and that the
applicant is not in violation of 18 U.S.C. §§ 541, 542 or
545, as well as paper or electronic copies of all CBP Form
7501 submitted in the prior six (6) months;

(v) If the applicant is a nonresident
manufacturer of electronic cigarette or vapor material that
has not registered to do business in the state of Wyoming
as a foreign corporation or business, the name and address
of any agent for service of process on the applicant. The
agent shall be an individual resident of this state, a
SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
domestic corporation or a foreign corporation having a
place of business in, and authorized to do business in,
this state;

(vi) Other information as the department may
require for the purpose of administering this chapter.

(c) The licensee shall pay an annual nonrefundable
fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

(d) Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer of
electronic cigarette or vapor material shall file and
thereafter maintain a deposit with the state treasurer or a
bond issued by a surety company licensed and authorized to
do business in Wyoming in the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) and shall run to the state of Wyoming.
A surety on a manufacturer's bond shall be liable up to the
amount of the bond, and the state may execute on the surety
bond for the payment of fines and penalties imposed on the
manufacturer under this section and, where appropriate, for
the costs of seizure and destruction of products sold in
violation of this section. If the state executes on the
surety bond, it shall require the principal to provide an
SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
additional bond as a requirement for retaining or
maintaining its license. The failure to maintain a current
and complete bond to the satisfaction of the department
shall result in the suspension or revocation of the
licensee’s license.

(e) Each licensed electronic cigarette or vapor
material manufacturer shall submit to the department every
six (6) months an attestation confirming that the
information submitted in its prior license application and
certification remains accurate or indicating changes, and
all copies of CBP Form 7501 submitted in the prior six (6)
months.

(f) Submission of a false certification constitutes
an unfair or deceptive practice prohibited by the Wyoming
Consumer Protection Act, and the attorney general may seek
remedies available under that act. In addition, the
department may notify appropriate federal and state
agencies of false information submitted on a certification
form.

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
(g) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department shall
maintain and make publicly available on the department's
official website a list of all licensed electronic
cigarette and vapor material manufacturers.

(h) Fees collected under the provisions of this
section shall be credited to the cigarette taxes
administration mitigation account which is hereby created.
Funds within the cigarette taxes administration mitigation
account are continuously appropriated to the department and
shall only be used by the department for the administration
and enforcement of this chapter.

Section 2. W.S. 14-3-301(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xii), 39-18-101(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xii), 39-18-106(a) and by creating new subsections (d) and
(e) and 39-18-108(c)(vii) and by creating a new paragraph
(xiii) and a new subsection (f) are amended to read:

14-3-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
(xii) "Delivery sale" means any sale of a
nicotine product to a consumer in this state where either:

(A) The consumer submits the order for the
sale by means of a telephonic or other method of voice
transmission, the mail or any other delivery service or by
way of the internet or other online service; or

(B) The nicotine product is delivered by
use of the mail or a delivery service, regardless of
whether the seller is located within or outside this state.

39-18-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(xii) "Electronic cigarette or vapor material
manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
fabricates, assembles, processes or labels an electronic
cigarette or vapor material for sale in this state.

39-18-106. Licensing; permits.

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
(a) Every wholesaler, cigarette importer, electronic
cigarette or vapor material manufacturer and cigarette
manufacturer who sells or offers to sell nicotine products
in this state must have a license to do so issued by the
department. No license or renewal of a license shall be
granted under this section unless the wholesaler states in
writing, under penalty for false swearing, that he shall
comply fully with W.S. 9-4-1201 through 9-4-1209. The
license fee is ten dollars ($10.00) per year or fraction
thereof and is valid through June 30 in each year. The
license will be granted only to wholesalers who own or
operate the place from which sales are made and additional
licenses must be obtained for each separate location. The
licenses are transferable pursuant to rules and regulations
promulgated by the department.

(d) No license for an electronic cigarette or vapor
material manufacturer shall be granted, maintained or
renewed unless the manufacturer satisfies the requirements
of W.S. 39-18-112.

(e) Retailers shall purchase cigarettes and nicotine
products only from a wholesaler, electronic cigarette or
SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
vapor material manufacturer or cigarette importer who is
licensed under this chapter.

39-18-108. Enforcement.

(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:

(vii) Any person who does any act prohibited by
this article, or omits, neglects or refuses to comply with
any duty imposed upon him by this article, or causes not to
be done any of the things required by this article, or does
any act prohibited by this article, may, in addition to any
other penalty provided by this article, be liable for a
first violation penalty of not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00) or five (5) times the retail value of
the nicotine product at issue, whichever is lesser, and for
a second violation a penalty of one thousand five hundred
dollars ($1,500.00), to be recovered in a civil action. A
third or subsequent violation constitutes an unfair or
deceptive practice prohibited by the Wyoming Consumer
Protection Act, and the attorney general may seek remedies
available under that act, including injunctive relief;

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
(xiii) Any electronic cigarette or vapor
material held or offered for retail sale in this state that
is manufactured by a person or entity that has not received
an electronic cigarette or vapor material manufacturer
license as provided by this article is contraband goods and
may be seized by the department, with board approval, or
any peace officer of this state when so directed by the
department.

(f) Each retailer, distributor and wholesaler that
sells or distributes electronic cigarettes and vapor
material in this state shall be subject to not less than
two (2) unannounced compliance checks annually for purposes
of enforcing this section. Unannounced follow-up compliance
checks of all noncompliant retailers, distributors and
wholesalers shall be conducted within thirty (30) days
after any violation of this chapter. The department shall
publish the results of all compliance checks not less than
one (1) time each year and shall make the results available
to the public on request.

SF0194

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0776
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0194